Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1620
Incremental, defined.

Incremental means the difference in impacts that would occur due to failure or misoperation of the dam over the impacts that would occur without failure or misoperation of the dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 20.